Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Public Utility Commis-
sion of Oregon, for the following purposes:
(1) Utility program ......................... $ 18,697,255
(2) Residential Service
Protection Fund ........................ $ 9,662,469
(3) Administration.......................... $ 16,951,756
(4) Oregon Board of Maritime
Pilots......................................... $ 807,411
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $721,958
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Public Utility Commission  of
Oregon.
SECTION 3.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures  by the Public Utility
Commission of Oregon  from the universal service fund established in ORS 759.425 are not
limited.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 5035 (HB 5035-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 27, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 8, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5035 (HB 5035-A) Page 2